Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201653-175
Liquor; acquisition from other than licensed dealer; when unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to purchase, receive, acquire, accept, or possess any alcoholic liquor acquired from any person other than one duly licensed to handle alcoholic liquor under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act unless within the specific exemptions or exceptions provided in the act. No licensed retailer of alcoholic liquor shall purchase such liquor other than from a licensed wholesaler who has his or her place of business within this state. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the sale or exchange among collectors of commemorative bottles or uniquely designed decanters which contain alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 32, p. 398;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-332;

R.S.1943, § 53-175;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 27;

Laws 1989, LB 154, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 58;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 27.
April 19, 2016